Idaho, session 2025, H0346.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Treasurer the following amounts to
be expended for operating expenditures from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
General Fund $7,500
State Treasurer LGIP Fund 2,500
Treasurer's Office - Professional Services Fund 5,000
Abandoned Property Trust - Unclaimed Property Fund 10,000
TOTAL $25,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.